Missouri, session 2026, HB1615.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 376.060, 376.100, 379.035, 379.060, 379.520, and 379.590,
RSMo, are repealed and six new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
376.060, 376.100, 379.035, 379.060, 379.520, and 379.590, to read as follows:
376.060. When such corporators propose to form a joint stock company for the
purposes designated in section 376.010, the charter comprised in the declaration mentioned in
section 376.050 shall set forth
(1) The name assumed by such corporation and by which it shall be known;
(2) The place where the principal office for the transaction of its business shall be
located;
(3) The specific kind or kinds of business which it proposes to transact;
(4) The amount of its capital stock, and the number of shares into which it shall be
divided, and the manner in which it shall be paid up or secured;
(5) The manner in which the corporate powers granted by sections 376.010 to
376.670 shall be exercised, showing the number of directors, which shall not be less than
[nine or] five nor more than twenty-one, their powers and duties, the manner of electing
them, the mode of filling vacancies, and such other particulars as may be necessary to make
manifest the objects and purposes of the corporation, and the manner in which it is to be
conducted.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1615 2
376.100. When such corporators propose to form a mutual company, for the purpose
designated in section 376.010, the charter comprised in the declaration mentioned in section
376.050 shall set forth:
(1) The name assumed by such corporation, and by which it shall be known;
(2) The place where the principal office for the transaction of its business shall be
located;
(3) The specific kind or kinds of business which it proposes to transact;
(4) The number of persons from whom proposals for assurance shall be received, the
amount of premiums to be received on deposit, and the amount of cash to be paid on the
same, before the company shall begin to do business and issue policies;
(5) The manner in which the corporate powers granted by sections 376.010 to
376.670 are to be exercised, showing the number of directors, which shall not be [more than
twenty-one nor] less than [nine] five nor more than twenty-one, their powers and duties, the
manner of their election, the mode of filling vacancies, and such other particulars as may be
necessary to make manifest the objects and purposes of the association, and the manner in
which it is to be conducted.
379.035. When such incorporators propose to form a corporation for the purposes
designated in section 379.010, on the joint stock plan, the articles of incorporation or
association comprised in the declaration in section 379.030 shall set forth:
(1) The name assumed by such corporation, and by which it shall be known;
(2) The place where the principal office for the transaction of its business shall be
located;
(3) The specific kind or kinds of business which it proposes to transact;
(4) The amount of its capital stock, and the number of shares into which it shall be
divided, and the manner in which it shall be paid up or secured;
(5) The manner in which the corporate powers granted by this chapter shall be
exercised, showing the number of directors, which shall not be less than [nine] five nor more
than twenty-five; and such other particulars as may be necessary to make manifest the objects
and purposes of the corporation, and the manner in which it is to be conducted.
379.060. When such incorporators propose to form a corporation for the purpose of
doing business on the mutual plan, the charter comprised in the declaration mentioned in
section 379.030 shall set forth:
(1) The name assumed by such corporation, and by which it shall be known;
(2) The place where the principal office for the transaction of its business shall be
located;
(3) The specific kind or kinds of business which it proposes to transact;

HB 1615 3
(4) The number of persons from whom proposals for insurance shall be received, the
amount of premiums to be received on deposit, and the amount of cash to be paid on the
same, before the company shall begin to do business and issue policies;
(5) The manner in which the corporate powers granted by sections 379.010 to
379.160 are to be exercised, showing the number of directors and trustees, which shall not be
[more than thirteen nor] less than [nine] five nor more than thirteen, and their respective
powers and duties, and such other particulars as may be necessary to make manifest the object
and purposes of the association, and the manner in which it is to be conducted.
379.520. Whenever any such corporation desires to avail itself of the provisions of
sections 379.515 to 379.580 and to reorganize and extend and continue its corporate existence
under the general laws of this state after the time limited by law or its charter for the
termination of its corporate existence, the directors thereof shall within one year prior to such
time draw up and submit to its stockholders, if it be a stock company, or to its policyholders if
it be a mutual company, or to its stockholders and its policyholders in its mutual department if
it be a stock and mutual company, articles of association, which shall set forth
(1) The name of the company;
(2) The place where the principal office for the transaction of business shall be
located;
(3) The specific kinds of business it proposes to transact;
(4) The period of time for which its corporate existence shall be extended and
continued;
(5) The manner in which the corporate powers granted under the general insurance
statutes shall be exercised, showing the number of directors, which shall not be [more than
twenty-five nor] less than [nine] five nor more than twenty-five, and such other particulars
as may be necessary to make manifest the objects and purposes of the corporation; provided,
however, that the name of the corporation shall not be changed, nor shall the objects or plan
of business embrace any other or more than under the general insurance statutes of this state
can be carried on by any one corporation.
379.590. When any such company desires to avail itself of the provisions of sections
379.585 to 379.625, the directors thereof shall draw up articles of association which shall set
forth
(1) The name of the company;
(2) The place where the principal office for the transaction of business shall be
located;
(3) The specific kind of business it proposes to transact;
(4) The manner in which the corporate powers granted under the general insurance
statutes shall be exercised, showing the number of directors, which shall not be [more than

HB 1615 4
thirteen nor ] less than [nine] five nor more than thirteen, and such other particulars as may
be necessary to make manifest the objects and purposes of the corporation; provided,
however, that the name of the corporation shall not be changed, nor shall the object or plan of
business embrace any others than those designated in the existing charter, nor embrace more
than under the general insurance statutes of this state can be carried on by any one
corporation.
✔